Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202625-1802
Award of fees and expenses against state; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 25-1802 to 25-1807, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Fees and other expenses means reasonable attorney's fees and the reasonable expense of expert witnesses plus court costs, but shall not include any portion of an attorney's fee or salary paid by a unit of state or federal government in the case;

(2) Political subdivision means any village, city, county, school district, public power district, community college, natural resources district, or other unit of local government;

(3) State means the State of Nebraska, a state agency, or any official of the state acting in his or her official capacity; and

(4) State agency means any state constitutional office, any state administrative department, or any state board or commission established by an act of the Legislature.

Laws 1982, LB 192, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 855, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB935, § 4.
July 18, 2026